Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-203
School lands; abstracts and records; where kept.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall keep in its office a full and complete abstract of all educational lands of the State of Nebraska, and such other records as are necessary to show the condition of each tract of land from the time title was acquired by the state.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 3, p. 301;

R.S.1913, § 5847;

C.S.1922, § 5183;

C.S.1929, § 72-203;

Laws 1935, c. 163, § 2, p. 594;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-203;

R.S.1943, § 72-203.